Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-4324
Fees; disbursement.

All fees paid to the department pursuant to the Agricultural Liming Materials Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Fertilizers and Beneficial Substances Administrative Fund. All money credited to the fund shall be used by the department to aid in defraying expenses of administering the Agricultural Liming Materials Act and the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 24;

Laws 2003, LB 157, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB92, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 9.
March 17, 2026
Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act, see section 81-2,162.22.